Washington statutes.
RCW 15.09.050

Powers and duties.

Each horticultural pest and disease board shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To receive complaints concerning the infection of horticultural pests and diseases on any parcel of land within the county;

(2) To inspect or cause to be inspected any parcel of land within the county for the purpose of ascertaining the presence of horticultural pests and diseases as provided by RCW 15.09.070;

(3) To order any landowner to control and prevent the spread of horticultural pests and diseases from his or her property, as provided by RCW 15.09.080;

(4) To control and prevent the spread of horticultural pests and diseases on any property within the county as provided by RCW 15.09.080, and to charge the owner for the expense of such work in accordance with RCW 15.09.080 and 15.09.090;

(5) To employ such persons and purchase such goods and machinery as the board of county commissioners may provide;

(6) To adopt, following a hearing, such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the administration of this chapter.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6018; 1969 c 113 s 5.]